Idaho, session 2025, H0487.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-401B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-401B. APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION -- RECEIPT FOR FEE -- RECORD OF
APPLICANTS. (1) Application for the registration of a vehicle required to
be registered under the provisions of section 49-401A, Idaho Code, shall
be made to the assessor or the department as specified in that section, by
the owner upon the appropriate form. Every application shall contain the
owner's Idaho driver's license number, Idaho identification card number,
social security number or individual taxpayer identification number. In
the case of a business, the employer tax identification number is required.
Every application shall also contain the owner's true and full legal name.
In the event that the owner does not possess a social security number, indi-
vidual taxpayer identification number, Idaho driver's license number, or
Idaho identification card number, the owner shall present written documen-
tation sufficient to the department to determine that no social security
number has been issued. In the event that a business, trust or other statuto-
rily created entity is not required to have and does not possess an employer
tax identification number, the applicant shall provide a written statement
certifying that the entity does not possess an employer tax identification
number. Such application must be signed by the owner and contain his resi-
dence address and mailing address, if different, and a brief description of
the vehicle to be registered, including the name of the maker, the type of
fuel used, and the identification number. If an applicant has submitted an
application pursuant to the provisions of chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code,
then the applicant may state in the application required pursuant to this
section the applicant's alternative Idaho mailing address in place of his or
her residence address. Upon registration of a new vehicle, the application
shall also show the date of sale by the manufacturer or dealer to the person
first operating such vehicle. The application shall contain any other in-
formation as may be required by the department and shall contain a provision
that allows an owner to choose to participate in the Idaho state parks pass-
port program. The assessor shall issue to the applicant a receipt for any fee
paid. Social security numbers collected shall not appear on certificates of
registration, and all applications on file shall be exempt from disclosure,
except as provided in sections 49-202, 49-203 and 49-203A, Idaho Code.
(2) The assessor shall record on a form prescribed and furnished by the
department, the names of all owners of vehicles residing in the county who
make application for registration, together with the amounts of the fees
paid by such owners.


(3) When application for registration is made by any motor carrier, the
assessor or the department shall require each such applicant to execute a
certification of safety compliance.
(4) Vehicles registered under the proportional registration provi-
sions of section 49-435, Idaho Code, shall be registered by the department.
(5) Every owner of a vehicle registered by a county assessor shall give
his physical domicile residence address or the business physical principal
address to the assessor so that the proper county can be entered upon the
registration. Failure to do so shall be unlawful. The department shall then
attribute the registration, and all fees to be apportioned to the highway
distribution account, to the county of residence regardless of the county
in which the registration occurred. Fees imposed under the provisions of
sections 40-827 and 40-1416, Idaho Code, shall be separately identified
and accounted for, and paid to the highway district for which collected.
Fees collected in addition to vehicle registration fees for the Idaho state
parks passport program parks and recreation services, as provided in section
49-402(11) 49-455, Idaho Code, shall be separately identified and accounted
for and paid to the state treasurer on a monthly basis to be upon collection
of the fee. The fee shall be promptly deposited in the park and recreation
fund as specified in section 49-402(11) established in section 67-4225,
Idaho Code. For the purposes of vehicle registration, a person is an actual
and permanent resident of the county in which he has his principal residence
or domicile. A principal residence or domicile shall not be a person's work-
place, vacation, or part-time residence.
(6) A violation of the provisions of this section shall be an infrac-
tion.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402. ANNUAL REGISTRATION. (1) The annual fee for operating each
pickup truck, each neighborhood electric vehicle and each other motor ve-
hicle having a maximum gross weight not in excess of eight thousand (8,000)
pounds and that complies with the federal motor vehicle safety standards as
defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code, shall be:
Vehicles one (1) and two (2) years old .........................$69.00
Vehicles three (3) and four (4) years old ......................$57.00
Vehicles five (5) and six (6) years old ........................$57.00
Vehicles seven (7) and eight (8) years old .....................$45.00
Vehicles over eight (8) years old .............................$45.00
There shall be twelve (12) registration periods, starting in January
for holders of validation registration stickers numbered 1, and proceed-
ing consecutively through December for holders of validation registration
stickers numbered 12, each of which shall start on the first day of a calendar
month and end on the last day of the twelfth month from the first day of the
beginning month. Registration periods shall expire midnight on the last day
of the registration period in the year designated by the validation regis-
tration sticker. The numeral digit on the validation registration stickers
shall, as does the registration card, fix the registration period under the
staggered registration system for the purpose of reregistration and notice
of expiration.


A vehicle that has once been registered for any of the above-designated
periods shall, upon reregistration, be registered for the period bearing the
same number, and the registration card shall show and be the exclusive proof
of the expiration date of registration and licensing. Vehicles may be ini-
tially registered for less than a twelve (12) month period, or for more than a
twelve (12) month period, and the fee prorated on a monthly basis if the frac-
tional registration tends to fulfill the purpose of the monthly series reg-
istration system.
(2) For all school buses operated either by a nonprofit, nonpublic
school or operated pursuant to a service contract with a school district for
transporting children to or from school or in connection with school-ap-
proved activities, the annual fee shall be twenty-four dollars ($24.00) and
shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration
and notice of expiration.
(3) For all motorcycles and motor-driven cycles that comply with the
federal motor vehicle safety standards, operated upon on the public high-
ways, the annual fee shall be nineteen dollars ($19.00) and shall be subject
to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of
expiration.
(4) For operation of an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or
motorbike, excluding a motorbike with an engine displacement of fifty (50)
cubic centimeters or less, on city, county or highway district roads or
highways open to such use, a restricted vehicle license plate fee pursuant
to section 49-450, Idaho Code, shall be paid. In addition, the certifi-
cate of number fee specified in section 67-7122, Idaho Code, shall be paid
as provided in section 67-7122, Idaho Code. The certificate of number and
restricted vehicle license plate exemption provided in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code, applies to all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, motor-
bikes and motorcycles used for the purposes described in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code. Nonresidents shall be allowed to purchase a restricted vehicle
license plate and validation sticker pursuant to section 67-7124, Idaho
Code, for an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, or motorbike.
(5) (4) For all motor homes, the fee shall be as specified in subsection
(1) of this section and shall be in addition to the fees provided for in sec-
tion 49-445, Idaho Code.
(6) (5) Registration fees shall not be subject to refund.
(7) (6) A financial institution or repossession service contracted to
a financial institution repossessing vehicles under the terms of a security
agreement shall move the vehicle from the place of repossession to the finan-
cial institution's place of business on a repossession plate. The reposses-
sion plate shall also be used for demonstrating the vehicle to a prospective
purchaser for a period not to exceed ninety-six (96) hours. The registration
fees for repossession plates shall be as required in subsection (1) of this
section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other fees required
under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to the registra-
tion fee. The repossession plate shall be subject to staggered registration
for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(8) (7) A wrecker or towing business engaged in the process of towing
motorized vehicles that have been wrecked, abandoned, salvaged or may be
disabled may apply for a wrecker plate to be displayed on those vehicles


being towed, provided the power unit is properly registered under this
chapter. The registration fees for wrecker plates shall be as required in
subsection (1) of this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old.
All other fees required under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in
addition to the registration fee and shall be subject to staggered registra-
tion for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(9) (8) In addition to the annual registration fee in this section,
there shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and
an annual program fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for all special license
plate programs for those license plates issued pursuant to sections 49-404A,
49-407, 49-408, 49-409, 49-414, 49-416, 49-418 and 49-418D, Idaho Code. For
special plates issued pursuant to sections 49-406 and 49-406A, Idaho Code,
there shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) but
there shall be no annual renewal fee. For special plates issued pursuant
to sections 49-415D, 49-417, 49-417A, 49-417B, 49-417C, 49-417D, 49-418A,
49-418B, 49-418C, 49-419, 49-419A, 49-419C, 49-419E, 49-420, 49-420A,
49-420B, 49-420C, 49-420D, 49-420E, 49-420J, 49-420K, 49-420L, 49-420M,
49-420N, 49-420O, 49-420P, 49-420Q, 49-420R, and 49-420S, Idaho Code, and
any new special plate program effective on and after January 1, 2013, pur-
suant to section 49-402D, Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program fee
of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) and an annual program fee of twenty-five
dollars ($25.00). The fees contained in this subsection shall be applicable
to all new special plate programs and shall be subject to staggered registra-
tion for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration. The initial
program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state high-
way account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of special
license plate programs, unless otherwise specified by law.
(10) (9) Any vehicle that does not meet federal motor vehicle safety
standards shall not be registered and shall not be permitted to operate on
public highways of the state, as defined in section 40-117, Idaho Code, un-
less otherwise specifically authorized.
(11) In addition to annual registration fees as provided in this sec-
tion, registrants may pay a fee to purchase an Idaho state parks passport
authorizing resident motor vehicle entry into all Idaho state parks. Reg-
istrants may pay the fee for a one (1) year or two (2) year period of time.
The fee shall be ten dollars ($10.00) for one (1) year and twenty dollars
($20.00) for two (2) years. All fees collected pursuant to this subsection
shall be deposited into the park and recreation fund and shall be subject to
appropriation. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall not be con-
sidered a motor vehicle registration fee as provided in section 17, article
VII, of the constitution of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 3. That Section 49-402B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402B. OPTIONAL BIENNIAL REGISTRATION. (1) At the option of the ap-
plicant, any vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402(1)
through (5) (4) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may be registered for a period of
two (2) years for a fee that is double the fee currently assessed for annual
registration of the vehicle in section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code.


(2) If any vehicle registered under a special license plate program is
registered for a two (2) year period as provided in this section, the regis-
trant shall also be required to pay the special programs fees for a two (2)
year period.
(3) Any vehicle registered pursuant to section 49-435, Idaho Code,
shall not be eligible for biennial registration.
(4) The additional fee collected for emergency medical services pur-
suant to section 49-452, Idaho Code, or project choice pursuant to section
49-454, Idaho Code, or parks and recreation services pursuant to section
49-455, Idaho Code, shall also be doubled for any registration issued under
the provisions of this section.
(5) The administrative fee collected for issuance of a motor vehicle
registration shall be the same as for an annual registration and shall not be
doubled or in any way increased solely because of registration under the pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 4, Title 49, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 49-455, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
49-455. PARKS AND RECREATION SERVICES FEE. (1) A parks and recre-
ation services fee of nine dollars ($9.00) shall be collected in addition
to each motor vehicle registration fee amount collected pursuant to section
49-402(1) through (4), Idaho Code. For vehicles registered pursuant to
section 49-402(1) through (4), Idaho Code, that are biennially registered
pursuant to the provisions of section 49-402B, Idaho Code, the fee shall be
eighteen dollars ($18.00).
(2) The fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in
the park and recreation fund established in section 67-4225, Idaho Code, and
shall be allocated pursuant to section 67-7109, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-4223A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 42, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-4220, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-4220. ACCESS TO IDAHO STATE PARKS. (1) Any resident who is entering
any Idaho state park with a vehicle registered pursuant to section 49-402(1)
through (4), Idaho Code, shall be authorized to enter without paying the mo-
tor vehicle entrance fee.
(2) A nonresident may purchase a daily or annual motor vehicle entrance
pass from the department of parks and recreation.
SECTION 7. That Section 67-7102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 67-7103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 9. That Section 67-7104, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Section 67-7106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 67-7118, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. That Section 67-7122, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 67-7123, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. That Section 67-7124, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 15. That Section 67-7126, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 16. That Section 67-7130, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 17. That Section 67-7131, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 18. That Section 67-7101, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:
(1) "All-terrain vehicle" or "ATV" means any recreational motor vehi-
cle designed for or capable of traveling off developed roadways and highways
with three (3) or more tires and is fifty-five (55) inches or less in width,
with a wheelbase of sixty-one (61) inches or less, and with handlebar steer-
ing and a seat designed to be straddled by the operator.
(2) "Board" means the park and recreation board created under authority
of established in section 67-4221, Idaho Code.
(3) "Bona fide snowmobile program" means services or facilities as ap-
proved by the department that will benefit snowmobilers such as snowmobile
trail grooming, plowing and maintaining snowmobile parking areas and facil-
ities, and trail signing.
(4) "Dealer" means any person who engages in the retail sale of or
rental of snowmobiles, motorbikes, utility type vehicles or all-terrain
vehicles.
(5) "Department" means the Idaho department of parks and recreation.
(6) "Designated parking area" means an area located, constructed,
maintained, and signed with the approval of the land manager or owner.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department of parks and recre-
ation.
(8) "Highway." (See section 40-109, Idaho Code, but excepting public
roadway as defined in this section)


(9) "Motorbike" means any self-propelled two (2) wheeled motorcycle or
motor-driven cycle, excluding tractors, designed for or capable of travel-
ing off developed roadways and highways and also referred to as trailbikes
trail bikes, enduro bikes, trials bikes, motocross bikes or dual purpose mo-
torcycles.
(10) "Nonresident" shall have the same meaning as in section 36-202,
Idaho Code.
(10) (11) "Off-highway vehicle" or "OHV" means an all-terrain vehicle,
motorbike, specialty off-highway vehicle or utility type vehicle as defined
in this section.
(11) (12) "Operator" means any person who is in physical control of a mo-
torbike, all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, specialty off-highway
vehicle or snowmobile.
(12) (13) "Owner" means every person holding record title to a motor-
bike, all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, specialty off-highway ve-
hicle or snowmobile and entitled to the use or possession thereof, other than
a lienholder or other person having a security interest only.
(13) (14) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, cor-
poration, or any other body or group of persons, whether incorporated or not,
and regardless of the degree of formal organization.
(14) (15) "Public roadway" means all portions of any highway controlled
by an authority other than the Idaho transportation department.
(15) (16) "Snowmobile" means any self-propelled vehicle under two thou-
sand (2,000) pounds unladened gross weight, designed primarily for travel on
snow or ice or over natural terrain, that may be steered by tracks, skis, or
runners.
(16) (17) "Specialty off-highway vehicle" means any vehicle manufac-
tured, designed or constructed exclusively for off-highway operation that
does not fit the definition of an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehi-
cle or motorbike as defined in this section. The vehicle classification pro-
vided for in this subsection shall become effective on January 1, 2010.
(17) (18) "Utility type vehicle" or "UTV" means any recreational motor
vehicle other than an ATV, motorbike or snowmobile as defined in this sec-
tion, designed for and capable of travel over designated roads, traveling
on four (4) or more tires and having a maximum width less than eighty (80)
inches. A utility type vehicle must have a minimum width of fifty (50) inches
and a minimum weight of at least nine hundred (900) pounds. Utility type ve-
hicle does not include golf carts, vehicles specially designed to carry a
disabled person, implements of husbandry as defined in section 49-110(2),
Idaho Code, or vehicles otherwise registered under title 49, Idaho Code. A
"utility type vehicle" or "UTV" also means a recreational off-highway vehi-
cle or ROV.
(18) (19) "Vendor" means any entity authorized by the department to sell
recreational certificates of number and nonresident user certificates.
(19) (20) "Winter recreational parking locations" means designated
parking areas established and maintained with funds acquired from the
cross-country skiing recreation account.
SECTION 19. That Section 67-7105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


67-7105 67-7102. GOVERNMENT OWNERSHIP. Certificate of number and reg-
istration portions Payment of the fee required pursuant to section 49-455,
Idaho Code, and nonresident user certificate requirements of this chapter
shall not apply to snowmobiles, all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehi-
cles, specialty off-highway vehicles, and motorbikes owned and operated by
the federal government, a state government or a subdivision of it.
SECTION 20. That Section 67-7132, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7132 67-7103. RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board shall adopt and en-
force administrative rules and regulations under the provisions of chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code, as necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to re-
quire the department to validate ownership of OHVs and snowmobiles or to val-
idate or issue certificates of number to be assigned to specifically iden-
tifiable OHVs or snowmobiles. The department shall not be required to issue
certificates of number to OHVs or snowmobiles by specific reference or to is-
sue by a vehicle identification number, title number, or the like.
SECTION 21. That Section 67-7133, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7133 67-7104. RESPONSIBILITY FOR ENFORCEMENT. The provisions of
this chapter, and any rule promulgated by the board pursuant to this chap-
ter, shall be enforced by the law enforcement personnel of the Idaho state
police, the department of fish and game, employees of the department of parks
and recreation authorized by the director of the Idaho state police, the
sheriffs and their deputies of the various counties in the state, and peace
officers of each city.
SECTION 22. That Section 67-7108, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7108 67-7105. PROHIBITION AGAINST NUMBERING BY POLITICAL SUB-
DIVISIONS. EXCLUSIVITY. The provisions of this chapter shall govern the
numbering and registration of snowmobiles, all-terrain vehicles, motor-
bikes, specialty off-highway vehicles, and utility type vehicles operated
in this state. All political subdivisions of the state are expressly pro-
hibited from numbering, or registering, requiring additional fees for use,
or otherwise regulating the use of snowmobiles, all-terrain vehicles, mo-
torbikes, specialty off-highway vehicles, and utility type vehicles in any
respect, except as provided in section 49-426, Idaho Code, relating to the
use of off-highway vehicles on highways.
SECTION 23. That Section 67-7113, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7113 67-7106. VIOLATIONS -- ACCOUNTABLE FOR PROPERTY DAMAGE. (1)
Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who violates any pro-
vision of this chapter, or any rule promulgated by the department pursuant to


this chapter, shall be guilty of an infraction and shall be punished by a fine
of one hundred dollars ($100).
(2) In addition thereto, the operator and/or owner of the snowmobile or
OHV shall be responsible and held accountable to the owner of any lands where
trees, shrubs, or other property have been damaged as the result of travel
over their premises such lands.
SECTION 24. That Section 67-7111, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7111 67-7107. ACCIDENT RESULTING IN PERSONAL INJURIES OR PROPERTY
DAMAGE. The operator of any snowmobile or OHV involved in any accident re-
sulting in injuries to or death to any person or property damage to prop-
erty other than the operator's snowmobile or OHV in the estimated amount of
two hundred dollars ($200) or more, or a person acting for the operator, or
the owner of the snowmobile or OHV having knowledge of the accident should
the operator of the snowmobile or OHV be unknown, shall immediately notify
a proper law enforcement agency of the facts relating to the accident and
within five (5) days file a report of the circumstances with the department
on forms prescribed by the department. For any accident occurring on a high-
way or public roadway, the owner, the operator, or both shall be subject to
the provisions of section 49-2417, Idaho Code.
SECTION 25. That Section 67-7114, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7114 67-7108. OPERATION UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL, DRUGS OR
ANY OTHER INTOXICATING SUBSTANCE. Any person driving or operating a snow-
mobile, motorbike, utility type vehicle, specialty off-highway vehicle, or
all-terrain vehicle under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or any other in-
toxicating substance on a public roadway or highway or off-highway shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor.
SECTION 26. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7109, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7109. DISTRIBUTION OF MONEYS. (1) The parks and recreation service
fee collected pursuant to section 49-455, Idaho Code, shall be distributed
each month accordingly:
(a) Sixty percent (60%) shall be deposited into the park and recreation
fund established in section 67-4225, Idaho Code, and shall be subject to
appropriation by the department;
(b) Sixteen percent (16%) shall be deposited into the OHV recreation
fund established in section 67-7133, Idaho Code. Of the moneys de-
posited into the OHV recreation fund:
(i) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the total amount deposited into
the OHV recreation fund shall be allocated to the off-highway ve-
hicle law enforcement fund. Moneys in such fund shall be paid and
used as follows:


1. Sheriffs of counties with a current or an actively de-
veloping off-highway vehicle law enforcement program recog-
nized by the department shall receive moneys from the fund
based on a formula provided for by rule promulgated by the
board, subject to legislative approval; and
2. Moneys from the fund shall be used only for off-highway
vehicle-related law enforcement activities;
(ii) Eight and four-tenths percent (8.4%) of the total amount
deposited into the OHV recreation fund shall be allocated to the
Idaho department of lands to provide off-highway vehicle oppor-
tunities and to repair damage directly related to off-highway
vehicle use; and
(iii) Any remaining moneys shall remain in the fund and shall be
used by the department for the purposes enumerated in section
67-7134, Idaho Code;
(c) Thirteen and one-half percent (13.5%) shall be deposited into the
state snowmobile fund established in section 67-7112, Idaho Code. Of
the moneys deposited into the state snowmobile fund:
(i) Four and four-tenths percent (4.4%) of the total amount
deposited into the state snowmobile fund shall be allocated to
the snowmobile search and rescue fund established in section
67-2913A, Idaho Code;
(ii) Two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the total amount de-
posited into the state snowmobile fund shall be allocated to the
state snowmobile avalanche fund established in section 67-7114,
Idaho Code;
(iii) Two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the total amount de-
posited into the state snowmobile fund shall be allocated to the
department of lands to provide snowmobile opportunities and to re-
pair damage directly related to snowmobile use; and
(iv) Of the remaining balance, eighty-three percent (83%) may be
distributed by the department to counties with a bona fide snowmo-
bile program. The distribution shall be based on a formula pro-
vided for by rule promulgated by the board, subject to legisla-
tive approval. Counties with a bona fide snowmobile program may
use up to fifteen percent (15%) of their county snowmobile moneys
for snowmobile law enforcement purposes upon the recommendation
by their county snowmobile advisory committee;
(d) Ten percent (10%) shall be deposited into the nonmotorized recre-
ation fund established in section 67-7141, Idaho Code, and shall be
available for use pursuant to section 67-7142, Idaho Code; and
(e) One half percent (0.5%) shall be deposited into the cross-country
skiing recreation fund established in section 67-7123, Idaho Code, and
shall be available for use pursuant to section 67-7124, Idaho Code.
(2)(a) Moneys collected from the sale of nonresident OHV user certifi-
cates, except for the vendor handling fee, shall be allocated pursuant
to subsection (1)(b)(i) through (iii) of this section.
(b) Moneys collected from the sale of nonresident snowmobile user cer-
tificates, except for the vendor handling fee, shall be allocated pur-
suant to subsection (1)(c)(i) through (iv) of this section.


(c) Moneys collected from the sale of winter recreational parking per-
mits, except for the vendor handling fee, shall be deposited into the
cross-country skiing recreation fund established in section 67-7123,
Idaho Code, and shall be available for use pursuant to section 67-7124,
Idaho Code.
(3) The department shall annually publish a report specifically iden-
tifying the uses of moneys allocated pursuant to this section. All records
of the department made or kept pursuant to this section shall be public
records.
(4) The Idaho department of lands shall annually publish a report
specifically identifying the uses of moneys allocated to it pursuant to this
section.
(5) The allocations shall be made in the order that they are listed in
this section. Moneys remaining in a fund after distributions have been made
shall remain in such fund and shall be available for use pursuant to the pur-
poses for which the fund was created.
(6) Collection of the parks and recreation services fee, nonresident
user certificate fees, and nonresident winter recreational parking permits
shall not impose any additional liability on the state of Idaho or any of its
political subdivisions or on the employees of the state or any of its polit-
ical subdivisions, and those entities and persons shall retain the limita-
tions of liability provided by section 36-1604, Idaho Code, regardless of
the use of such fees.
SECTION 27. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7110, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7110. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTIONS TO FUNDS. (1) A resident or nonresi-
dent may make a voluntary donation to support:
(a) The state snowmobile fund established in section 67-7112, Idaho
Code;
(b) The cross-country skiing recreation fund established in section
67-7123, Idaho Code;
(c) The OHV recreation fund established in section 67-7133, Idaho Code;
or
(d) The nonmotorized recreation fund established in section 67-7141,
Idaho Code.
(2) The department shall include an accommodation to notify an appli-
cant of the opportunity and to allow an applicant to designate such a dona-
tion.
(3) The department shall transfer all such donations received to the
appropriate account at least quarterly.
(4) None of the proceeds from voluntary donations made pursuant to this
section shall be used for administrative expenses of the department.
(5) The department may charge a convenience fee for any voluntary dona-
tion received pursuant to this section to offset any credit card processing
fees or other bank fees associated with processing or receiving a voluntary
donation.


SECTION 28. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7111, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7111. SNOWMOBILES -- RESIDENT, NONRESIDENT, AND COMMERCIAL OPERA-
TORS. (1) Idaho residents shall be permitted to operate snowmobiles for non-
commercial purposes pursuant to this chapter without having to purchase a
user certificate.
(2)(a) A nonresident operator of a noncommercial snowmobile shall ob-
tain a nonresident snowmobile user certificate before operating a snow-
mobile in Idaho.
(b) A fee of fifty-nine dollars and fifty cents ($59.50) shall be im-
posed for the issuance of a nonresident snowmobile user certificate.
The certificate may be purchased from the department or from a vendor
authorized by the department.
(c) An authorized vendor shall be entitled to retain a handling fee of
one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per nonresident snowmobile user cer-
tificate sold. Each vendor shall, no later than the fifteenth day of
each month, remit all moneys collected from the sale of a nonresident
snowmobile user certificates to the department, except for the handling
fee. Handling fees collected by the department shall be deposited into
the state snowmobile fund.
(d) In the absence of a bona fide program in the area or upon the request
of the bona fide county snowmobile advisory committee of the nearest af-
fected county in Idaho, the requirements for the nonresident snowmobile
user certificate may be waived by the park and recreation board on spe-
cific trails where the snowmobile trail grooming is solely supported by
a state other than Idaho.
(3) Resident and nonresident owners of snowmobiles used for rental pur-
poses shall purchase rental user certificates for seventy-five dollars and
fifty cents ($75.50) from the department or from a vendor authorized by the
department.
(4) All records of the department made or kept pursuant to this section
shall be public records.
SECTION 29. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7112, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7112. SNOWMOBILES -- STATE SNOWMOBILE FUND CREATED. There is
hereby established in the state treasury a dedicated fund to be known and
designated as the state snowmobile fund to be administered by the director
of the department of parks and recreation. The fund shall consist of moneys
appropriated to it pursuant to section 67-7109, Idaho Code, and such other
moneys that may be provided by legislative appropriation.
SECTION 30. That Section 67-7107, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7107 67-7113. SNOWMOBILES -- COUNTY ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (1) The
county commissioners of any county may appoint snowmobile advisory commit-


tees to serve at the pleasure of the county commissioners without salaries
and wages in an advisory capacity relating to the establishment and mainte-
nance of parking and unloading areas on public and private property, and the
expenditure of moneys deposited in the county snowmobile fund; and to serve
at the pleasure of the county commissioners. The persons selected shall be
active snowmobilers representing who represent snowmobile clubs, organi-
zations, or merchants engaged in the sale or rental of snowmobiles, or be a
member who are members of the general public actively engaged in the sport of
snowmobiling.
(2) The board of county commissioners is hereby authorized, upon ad-
visement of the special advisory committee, to use and expend the special
fund created in section 67-7106, Idaho Code, moneys appropriated to it out-
side the county.
SECTION 31. That Section 67-7107A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
67-7107A 67-7114. STATE SNOWMOBILE AVALANCHE FUND -- STATE SNOW-
MOBILE AVALANCHE FUND COMMITTEE. (1) There is hereby established in the
state treasurer's office treasury an account to be known and designated as
the "state snowmobile avalanche fund." This fund shall receive one dollar
($1.00) from each snowmobile certificate of number fee, one dollar ($1.00)
from each rental certificate of number fee, and one dollar ($1.00) from each
nonresident snowmobile user certificate issued by vendors, as provided for
in section 67-7106, Idaho Code moneys appropriated to it pursuant to section
67-7109, Idaho Code. This fund shall be managed by the state snowmobile
avalanche fund committee.
(2) The board shall appoint a state snowmobile avalanche fund committee
(SSAFC) of five (5) members. The membership of the SSAFC shall consist of the
director of the United States forest service national avalanche center, or
his designee, who shall chair the SSAFC, and one (1) active snowmobiler from
each of the following districts: north Idaho, central Idaho, south Idaho,
and east Idaho. These four (4) regional members of the SSAFC shall be ap-
pointed by the board from a list of no fewer than two (2) persons nominated by
the Idaho state snowmobile association, and said members shall serve a term
of four (4) years, except that the term of the initial appointees shall com-
mence on the date of appointment and shall be staggered such that at least
one (1) position is up for appointment each year. Each member of the SSAFC
must be a qualified elector of the state, maintaining a residence and domi-
cile within the district of appointment. For purposes of SSAFC membership
and representation, the four (4) districts shall be as follows:
(a) North Idaho consists of Boundary, Bonner, Kootenai, Benewah,
Latah, Shoshone, Clearwater, Nez Perce, Lewis, and Idaho counties.
(b) Central Idaho consists of Adams, Washington, Valley, Payette, Gem,
Boise, Canyon, Ada, Elmore, and Owyhee counties.
(c) South Idaho consists of Lemhi, Custer, Butte, Camas, Blaine, Good-
ing, Lincoln, Jerome, Minidoka, Twin Falls, and Cassia counties.
(d) East Idaho consists of Clark, Fremont, Jefferson, Madison, Teton,
Bonneville, Bingham, Power, Bannock, Caribou, Bear Lake, Franklin, and
Oneida counties.
(3) The duties of the SSAFC include:


(a) Determining and directing distributions from the state snowmobile
avalanche fund, at least annually, to avalanche centers within the
state of Idaho or avalanche centers providing reporting services within
the state of Idaho operated and administered by the national avalanche
center, United States forest service, or United States department of
agriculture. The SSAFC may require that applications or proposals be
submitted for review and consideration from avalanche centers seeking
funds from the state snowmobile avalanche fund. The SSAFC must require
the funds so distributed be used for existing avalanche center oper-
ations and maintenance within or for the benefit of areas within the
state of Idaho, which include: avalanche forecaster labor; website
and information technology improvements and maintenance; snowmobiles
and related equipment; remote weather station installation and upkeep;
avalanche education costs; and safety equipment;
(b) Representing the best interests of the snowmobile users in the dis-
trict from which each member is appointed; and
(c) Advising existing avalanche centers in Idaho and registered non-
profit organizations that support them as to whether current projects
meet the needs of snowmobile users in that area.
(4) The SSAFC shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(b),
Idaho Code.
SECTION 32. That Section 67-7109, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7109 67-7115. SNOWMOBILES -- PROHIBITION AGAINST HIGHWAY OPERA-
TION -- EXCEPTIONS. No person shall operate a snowmobile upon on any highway
or public roadway in this state, with the following exceptions:
(1) Properly numbered snowmobiles Snowmobiles may cross, as directly
as possible after a full and complete stop, highways and public roadways, ex-
cept controlled access highways, provided that the crossing can be made in
safety and that it safely and does not interfere with the free movement of ve-
hicular traffic approaching from either direction on the highway or public
roadway. It shall be the responsibility of the operator of the snowmobile to
yield the right-of-way to all vehicular traffic upon on any highway or public
roadway before crossing.
(2) Loading or unloading shall be done without causing a hazard to ve-
hicular traffic approaching from either direction on a highway or public
roadway. Loading or unloading shall be accomplished with regard to safety,
at the nearest possible point to the area of operation.
(3) The prohibition against operating snowmobiles upon on highways and
public roadways shall not apply to any highway or public roadway drifted or
covered with snow to an extent that travel on it by other motor vehicles is
impractical or impossible.
(4) Snowmobiles may be operated on that portion of a highway or public
roadway right-of-way that is not maintained or utilized for the operation of
conventional motor vehicles.
(5) Local authorities may, by ordinance, specifically designate public
roadways upon on which snowmobiles may be operated.


SECTION 33. That Section 67-7110, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7110 67-7116. SNOWMOBILES -- RESTRICTIONS. It shall be unlawful
for any person to drive or operate any snowmobile:
(1) At a rate of speed greater than reasonable and prudent under the ex-
isting conditions.
(2) In a negligent manner so as to endanger the person or property of
another, or to cause injury or damage to either, or to harass, chase or annoy
any wild game animals or birds or domestic animals.
(3) Without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of dusk
and dawn, or when upon on or crossing any public roadway or highway, or when
otherwise required for the safety of others.
(4) Without an adequate braking device which that may be operated by ei-
ther hand or foot.
(5) Without an adequate muffler, except when used in conjunction with
public racing events.
(6) Upon On a public roadway or highway without a valid motor vehicle
operator's license, unless the public roadway or highway is closed to other
motor vehicle travel.
SECTION 34. That Section 67-7112, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7112 67-7117. GROOMED SNOWMOBILE TRAILS. Counties shall have the
option to allow all-terrain vehicles and snowmobiles over one thousand
(1,000) pounds unladen gross weight, if numbered as a snowmobile, to use
snowmobile trails in the county. No other vehicles shall operate on groomed
snowmobile trails unless specifically allowed by the county. Any all-ter-
rain vehicle and snowmobile over one thousand (1,000) pounds unladen gross
weight operating on groomed snowmobile trails during the winter snowmobil-
ing season when the trails are groomed shall be numbered as a snowmobile
under the provisions of section 67-7103, Idaho Code. Violation of the provi-
sions of this section shall be an infraction.
SECTION 35. That Section 67-7115, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7115 67-7121. WINTER RECREATIONAL PARKING PERMIT -- FEE -- FINES --
PERMITS FOR SNOWMOBILE OWNERS -- EXEMPTIONS RESIDENT, NONRESIDENT, AND EX-
EMPTIONS. (1) Idaho residents shall not be required to purchase an annual or
temporary parking permit to park a vehicle in a winter recreational parking
location.
(1) (2) Except as hereinafter provided, no person shall provided in
this section, a nonresident shall not, from November 15 of any year to April
30 of the next year, park a vehicle in a winter recreational parking location
unless the vehicle displays an annual or temporary parking permit.
(3) The annual permit shall be permanently affixed and the temporary
permit shall be temporarily affixed on the front window of the vehicle near-
est the driver's seat in such a manner that they are the permit is completely
visible and shall be kept in a legible condition at all times.


(2) (4) The fee for the annual permit and the temporary permit shall be
set by the board, but shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30.00) for the annual
permit or ten dollars ($10.00) for the temporary permit.
(3) (5) The nonresident owner of any vehicle, as defined in chapter 1,
title 49, Idaho Code, that violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section has committed an infraction punishable as provided under section
18-113A, Idaho Code, and shall be punished with a fine of not less than twenty
dollars ($20.00) or more than fifty dollars ($50.00). The fact that a motor
vehicle which that is illegally parked under the provisions of this chapter
is registered or leased in the name of a person shall be considered prima
facie evidence that the person was in control of the vehicle at the time of
parking.
(4) (6) Snowmobile Nonresident snowmobile operators, when snowmobil-
ing, shall be allowed to park their transportation vehicles in a designated
winter recreational parking area without displaying purchasing a parking
permit but must display, in the same manner described in subsection (3) of
this section, the nonresident snowmobile user certificate.
(5) (7) No parking permit shall be required under the provisions of this
section for a vehicle owned and operated by the United States, any state or a
political subdivision of a state, or a vehicle registered in another state,
if that vehicle displays a similar cross-country skiing permit, but only to
the extent that an exception or privilege is granted under the laws of that
state for permit holders from this state.
SECTION 36. That Section 67-7116, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7116 67-7122. WINTER RECREATIONAL PARKING PERMIT -- PRINTING, DIS-
TRIBUTION, AND SALE. (1) The department shall print the parking permits and
shall supervise the sale of the permits throughout the state.
(2) The department shall distribute and sell the permits directly or
may authorize vendors under agreement according to rules and regulations
of the department. The department may require that the authorized ven-
dors be bonded in accordance with rules and regulations of the department.
Authorized vendors will receive a stipulated commission for each permit
sold.
(3) An authorized vendor shall be entitled to retain a handling fee of
one dollar ($1.00) per winter recreational parking permit sold. Each vendor
shall, no later than the fifteenth day of each month, remit all moneys col-
lected from the sale of winter recreational parking permits to the depart-
ment, except for the handling fee.
SECTION 37. That Section 67-7117, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7117 67-7123. WINTER RECREATIONAL PARKING PERMIT -- CROSS-COUNTRY
SKIING RECREATION ACCOUNT FUND CREATED. (1) There is hereby established in
the state treasury an account to be known as the "cross-country skiing recre-
ation account," into which the money specified in section 67-7118, Idaho
Code, shall be deposited fund. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated


to it pursuant to section 67-7109, Idaho Code, and such other moneys that may
be provided by legislative appropriation.
(2) The board is charged with the administration of the account for the
purposes specified in section 67-7118(3), Idaho Code this section and sec-
tions 67-7109 and 67-7124, Idaho Code.
(3) All claims against the account shall be examined, audited, and al-
lowed in the same manner now or hereafter provided by law for claims against
the state, except that the board is empowered to enter into agreements with
the counties for the disbursement of funds to them the counties on a project-
by-project basis.
SECTION 38. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7124, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7124. WINTER RECREATIONAL PARKING PERMIT -- CROSS-COUNTRY SKI-
ING RECREATION FUND -- USE OF MONEYS IN FUND. Any moneys remaining in the
cross-country skiing recreation fund shall be appropriated first for the
reimbursement for costs incurred in the removal of snow from winter recre-
ational parking locations. Any remaining moneys may be appropriated to
provide grants to public or nonprofit entities for the acquisition, lease,
development, and maintenance of sanitation facilities, trail marking, and
other facilities designed to promote the health and safety of persons en-
gaged in cross-country skiing.
SECTION 39. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7131, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7131. OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLES -- RESIDENT AND NONRESIDENT OPERA-
TORS. (1) Idaho residents shall be permitted to operate an OHV for noncom-
mercial purposes pursuant to this chapter without having to purchase a user
certificate.
(2)(a) A nonresident operator of a noncommercial OHV shall obtain a
nonresident OHV user certificate before operating an OHV in Idaho.
(b) A fee of twelve dollars ($12.00) shall be imposed for the issuance
of a nonresident OHV user certificate. The certificate may be purchased
from the department or from a vendor authorized by the department.
(c) An authorized vendor shall be entitled to retain a handling fee of
one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per nonresident OHV user certificate
sold. Each vendor shall, no later than the fifteenth day of each month,
remit all moneys collected from the sale of a nonresident snowmobile
user certificate to the department, except for the handling fee.
SECTION 40. That Section 67-7125, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7125 67-7132. OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLES -- NOISE ABATEMENT. (1) Except
as hereinafter provided in this section, every vehicle subject to numbering
under sections 67-7122 and 67-7124 the provisions of section 67-7131, Idaho
Code, shall comply with the provisions of this section. Every vehicle sub-


ject to the provisions of this section shall at all times be equipped with an
exhaust system in good working order and in constant operation. If the ve-
hicle was originally equipped with a noise suppressing system or if the ve-
hicle is required by law or regulation of this state or the federal govern-
ment to have a noise suppressing system, that system shall be maintained in
good working order. No person shall disconnect, modify or alter any part of
that system in any manner that will amplify or increase the vehicle's noise
emission above the noise limits established in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, except temporarily in order to make repairs, replacements or adjust-
ments. No person shall operate and no owner shall cause or permit to be oper-
ated any vehicle while the vehicle's noise emission exceeds the noise limits
established in subsection (3) of this section or while the vehicle's noise
suppressing system is disconnected, modified, or altered in violation of the
provisions of this section.
(2) No person shall operate a vehicle subject to the provisions of this
section unless that vehicle is equipped with a spark arrester device affixed
to the exhaust system of a type qualified and rated by the United States for-
est service. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to vehicles
being operated off the highway in an organized racing or competitive event
conducted on private land with the consent of the landowner.
(3) Any vehicle subject to the provisions of this section shall at all
times be equipped with a noise suppressing system or other device that limits
noise emission to a base level of not more than ninety-six (96) decibels when
measured on the "A" scale using standards and procedures established by the
society of automotive engineers (SAE), specifically SAE standard J1287,
June 1988, describing a test of a stationary vehicle with sound measured
twenty (20) inches and forty-five (45) degrees from the exhaust outlet, or as
otherwise described. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to
vehicles being operated off the highway in an organized racing or competi-
tive event conducted on private land with the consent of the landowner or on
public land under permit.
(a) The department shall adopt regulations in accordance with chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code, establishing the test procedures and instru-
mentation to be utilized. These procedures shall incorporate require-
ments for the test site environment and sound measuring equipment as set
forth in SAE standard J1287, June 1988.
(b) Instrumentation shall include but not be limited to a sound level
meter meeting the type 1, type S1A, type 2, or type S2A requirements
of the American national standards institute (ANSI) specification for
sound level meters, S1.4-1983; a sound level calibrator, microphone
wind screen, external engine speed tachometer.
(4) A showing that the noise emission level of any vehicle subject to
and not otherwise exempt from the provisions of this section exceeds ninety-
six (96) decibels, as described and tested in subsection (3) of this section,
shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 41. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7133, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


67-7133. OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLES -- OHV RECREATION FUND CREATED. There
is hereby established in the state treasury an account to be known and des-
ignated as the OHV recreation fund to be administered by the board. The fund
shall consist of moneys appropriated to it pursuant to section 67-7109,
Idaho Code, and such other moneys that may be provided by legislative appro-
priation.
SECTION 42. That Section 67-7127, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7127 67-7134. OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLES -- OHV RECREATION FUND -- USE OF
MONEYS IN ACCOUNT FUND. The board shall administer the OHV recreation ac-
count. The moneys derived from this account the OHV recreation fund shall be
used as follows:
(1) For the securing of special leases, use licenses, recreation ease-
ments or permits, or for the actual purchase of land under private, state, or
federal ownership to be used for public recreational off-highway vehicle ac-
tivity;
(2) For the securing, maintenance, construction, or development of
trails and other public recreational facilities for off-highway vehicle use
on private, state, and federal lands;
(3) To finance the formulation and implementation under the board's di-
rection of an off-the-road rider education program; and
(4) To acquire applicable federal matching funds.
SECTION 43. That Section 67-7128, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7128 67-7135. OFF-ROAD MOTOR VEHICLE ADVISORY COMMITTEE -- CRE-
ATION -- SELECTION -- TERM OF OFFICE -- DUTY. (1) The park and recreation
board shall appoint an off-road motor vehicle (ORMV) advisory committee
(ORMV) of nine (9) members. The membership of the advisory committee shall
consist of three (3) members each from northern Idaho, southwestern Idaho,
and southeastern Idaho. Two (2) members from each area shall represent the
following groups: motorbikes, ATV or UTV riders and snowmobilers. One (1)
member interested in ORMV projects shall be appointed from each area without
regard to the recreational activity in which that member participates and
shall represent interests other than motorbike, ATV or UTV riders and snow-
mobilers. Each member of the advisory committee shall be chosen by the park
and recreation board to serve a term of three (3) years, except that the term
of the initial appointees shall commence on the date of appointment and shall
be of staggered lengths. Each member of the advisory committee shall be a
qualified elector of the state. Duties shall include:
(a) Representing the best interests of the ORMV users and activities
which that they represent in the district from which they are appointed;
(b) Advising the department as to whether proposed ORMV projects meet
the needs of ORMV users in that area;
(c) Advising the department as to how funds can be used to rehabilitate
areas on public or private lands and how the department can assist in the
enforcement of laws and regulations governing the use of off-road vehi-
cles in the state of Idaho;


(d) The three (3) motorbike, all-terrain vehicle or utility type ve-
hicle representatives from the ORMV advisory committee shall advise
the department on matters relating to the use of moneys in the motorbike
recreation account as provided for in section 67-7127 67-7134, Idaho
Code.
(2) The committee shall be compensated as provided in section
59-509(f), Idaho Code, and authorized by the department.
SECTION 44. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7141, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7141. NONMOTORIZED RECREATION -- NONMOTORIZED RECREATION FUND
CREATED. There is hereby established in the state treasury a fund to be known
and designated as the nonmotorized recreation fund to be administered by the
director. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to it pursuant to
section 67-7109, Idaho Code, and such other moneys that may be provided by
legislative appropriation.
SECTION 45. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7142, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7142. NONMOTORIZED RECREATION -- NONMOTORIZED RECREATION FUND --
USE OF MONEYS IN FUND. The moneys derived from the nonmotorized recreation
fund shall be used as follows:
(1) For the securing of special leases, use licenses, recreation ease-
ments, or permits or for the actual purchase of land under private, state, or
federal ownership to be used for public recreational nonmotorized activity;
(2) For the securing, maintenance, construction, or development of
trails and other public recreational facilities enhancing nonmotorized use
on private, state, and federal lands;
(3) To finance the formulation and implementation, under the park and
recreation board's direction, of a nonmotorized user education program;
(4) To acquire applicable matching federal funds;
(5) To enforce the laws and regulations governing nonmotorized recre-
ational opportunities in the state of Idaho; and
(6) To distribute to governmental entities, Indian tribes, and non-
governmental organizations through an annual grant process determined by
the department. No more than fifty percent (50%) of moneys derived from the
fund shall be used for the grants described in this subsection.
SECTION 46. That Section 32-1410, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-1410. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE COURT FEES. (1) Each person who is found
guilty of or pleads guilty to any of the following alcohol-, substance abuse-
or domestic violence-related offenses shall pay a thirty dollar ($30.00) fee
to be deposited in the statewide drug court, mental health court and family
court services fund, as provided in section 1-1625, Idaho Code, to assist in
funding the domestic violence courts:


(a) Section 18-918, Idaho Code (domestic violence);
(b) Section 18-920, Idaho Code (violation of no contact order);
(c) Section 18-923, Idaho Code (attempted strangulation);
(d) Section 18-1502, Idaho Code (beer, wine or other alcohol age viola-
tions);
(e) Section 18-2510(3), Idaho Code (introduce, convey, possess, re-
ceive, obtain or remove major contraband, except major contraband as
defined in section 18-2510(5)(c)(ii), (iv) and (v), Idaho Code);
(f) Section 18-4006 (3)(b), Idaho Code (vehicular manslaughter in the
commission of a violation of section 18-8004 or 18-8006, Idaho Code);
(g) Section 18-5414, Idaho Code (intentionally making false state-
ments);
(h) Section 18-8004, Idaho Code (persons under the influence of alco-
hol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances);
(i) Section 18-8006, Idaho Code (aggravated driving while under the in-
fluence of alcohol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances);
(j) Section 23-312, Idaho Code (persons under twenty-one and intoxi-
cated persons -- inhibited sales);
(k) Section 23-505, Idaho Code (transportation of alcoholic bever-
ages);
(l) Section 23-602, Idaho Code (unlawful manufacture, traffic in,
transportation and possession of alcohol beverage);
(m) Section 23-603, Idaho Code (dispensing to minor);
(n) Section 23-604, Idaho Code (minors -- purchase, consumption or pos-
session prohibited);
(o) Section 23-605, Idaho Code (dispensing to drunk);
(p) Section 23-612, Idaho Code (beer, wine or other alcoholic beverages
on public school grounds);
(q) Section 23-615, Idaho Code (restrictions on sale);
(r) Section 23-949, Idaho Code (persons not allowed to purchase, pos-
sess, serve, dispense or consume beer, wine or other alcoholic liquor);
(s) Section 23-1013, Idaho Code (restrictions concerning age);
(t) Section 23-1024, Idaho Code (false representation as being twenty-
one or more years of age a misdemeanor);
(u) Section 23-1333, Idaho Code (open or unsealed containers of wine in
motor vehicles on highways prohibited);
(v) Section 23-1334, Idaho Code (minors -- authorization to deliver);
(w) Criminal violation of any of the provisions of chapter 27, title 37,
Idaho Code;
(x) Section 39-6312, Idaho Code (violation of order -- penalties);
(y) Section 67-7034, Idaho Code (persons under the influence of alco-
hol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances); and
(z) Section 67-7114 67-7108, Idaho Code (operation under the influence
of alcohol, drugs or any other intoxicating substance).
(2) The clerk of the district court shall collect the fees set forth in
subsection (1) of this section. The fees shall be paid over to the county
treasurer who shall, within fifteen (15) days after the end of the month,
pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the drug court, mental
health court and family court services fund.


SECTION 47. That Section 49-420, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-420. IDAHO SNOWMOBILE PLATES. (1) On and after January 1, 1999, any
person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of sec-
tion 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for
which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and upon de-
partment approval receive special Idaho snowmobile license plates in lieu of
regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand
(26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho snowmobile license plates for other
vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the de-
partment.
(2) In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4,
title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five
dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars
($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00)
of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be de-
posited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of
administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars
($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal
fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the Idaho department of
parks and recreation state snowmobile account fund established pursuant to
section 67-7106 67-7112, Idaho Code.
(3) Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the pro-
visions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer
the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer
fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt
of the new registration from the department.
(4) The Idaho snowmobile license plate shall be of a color and design
comparable to the standard issue of license plates with blue numerals on a
red, white and blue background, except that the word "Idaho" shall appear on
each plate and the county designator shall be omitted to provide for distin-
guishing designs and slogans, acceptable to the Idaho state snowmobile as-
sociation, to be added to the plate. The design shall be approved by the de-
partment and shall utilize a numbering system as determined by the depart-
ment. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design,
shall be paid by the Idaho state snowmobile association.
(5) Sample Idaho snowmobile license plates may be purchased for a fee
of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited
in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be
deposited in the state snowmobile account within the department of parks and
recreation. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample
plates.
SECTION 48. That Section 49-426, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-426. EXEMPTIONS FROM OPERATING FEES. The provisions of this chap-
ter with respect to operating fees must not apply to:


(1) Motor vehicles owned or leased by the United States, the state,
a city, a county, any department thereof, any political subdivision or
municipal corporation of the state, any taxing district of the state, any
state-registered nonprofit subscription fire protection unit, or any or-
ganization, whether incorporated or unincorporated, organized for the
operation, maintenance, or management of an irrigation project or irriga-
tion works or system or for the purpose of furnishing water to its members
or shareholders, but in other respects the provisions of this chapter are
applicable.
(2) Farm tractors, implements of husbandry, manufactured homes that
qualify for an exemption under the provisions of section 49-422, Idaho Code,
road rollers, wheel-mounted tar buckets, portable concrete or mortar mix-
ers, wheel-mounted compressors, tow dollies, portable toilet trailers,
street sweepers, other construction equipment, forestry equipment, lawn
and grounds equipment, and similar devices as determined by the department
that are temporarily operated or moved upon on the highways need not be
registered under the provisions of this chapter, nor will implements of hus-
bandry be considered towed units under registration of vehicle combinations
as defined in section 49-108(2), Idaho Code. In addition, self-propelled
wheelchairs, three-wheeled bicycles, wheelchair conveyances, golf carts,
lawn mowers, and scooters operated by persons who by reason of physical dis-
ability are otherwise unable to move about as pedestrians are exempt from
registration requirements under the provisions of this chapter. Motorcy-
cles and off-highway vehicles need not be licensed under the provisions of
this chapter or numbered pursuant to the provisions of sections 67-7122 and
67-7124, Idaho Code, if they are being used exclusively in connection with
agricultural, horticultural, dairy and livestock growing and feeding oper-
ations, or used exclusively for snow removal purposes. Travel upon on the
public highways must be limited to travel between farm or ranch locations.
Motorcycles and off-highway vehicles used for this purpose must meet the
emblem requirements of section 49-619, Idaho Code.
(3) Off-highway vehicles licensed pursuant to this chapter and num-
bered pursuant to section 67-7122 or 67-7124, Idaho Code, and those vehicles
exempt from licensing and numbering pursuant to subsection (2) of this sec-
tion are permitted to operate on:
(a) All highways that are not state highways and that are not interstate
highways;
(b) Any non-full access-controlled state highway within the boundaries
of a municipality and extending one (1) mile from such boundary lines
where the posted speed limit is sixty (60) miles per hour or less; and
(c) Any non-full access-controlled state highway outside of municipal-
ities where the posted speed limit is sixty-five (65) miles per hour or
less for continuous distances of no more than five (5) miles for the lim-
ited purpose of connecting between OHV trails, obtaining access to or
from an OHV trail, or to access necessary services such as fuel, lodg-
ing, food and beverage, and maintenance.
(4) Off-highway vehicles licensed pursuant to this chapter and num-
bered pursuant to section 67-7122 or 67-7124, Idaho Code, and those vehicles
exempt from licensing and numbering pursuant to subsection (2) of this sec-
tion must be permitted to cross a highway, except interstate highways and


full access-controlled state highways, at a public road intersection and
at any point where an OHV trail intersects, provided the vehicle comes to a
full and complete stop before making the crossing and yields to any highway
traffic.
(5) The operation of off-highway vehicles licensed pursuant to this
chapter and numbered pursuant to section 67-7122 or 67-7124, Idaho Code,
and those vehicles exempt from licensing and numbering pursuant to subsec-
tion (2) of this section are not permitted on interstate highways and full
access-controlled state highways, provided that the Idaho transportation
board may designate sections of such state highways upon on which off-high-
way vehicles may travel.
(6) The Idaho transportation board may, after sufficient public notice
is given and a public hearing held, designate sections of state highways that
are closed or limited to off-highway vehicle use. The Idaho transportation
board must deliver written notice to the director of the Idaho department of
parks and recreation at least thirty (30) days before the public hearing and
must accept and consider any comment from the director of the Idaho depart-
ment of parks and recreation received within the thirty (30) day period or at
the public hearing.
(7) Any political subdivision of the state of Idaho may, but only after
sufficient public notice is given and a public hearing held, adopt local or-
dinances or resolutions designating highways or sections of highways under
its jurisdiction that are closed or limited to off-highway vehicle use. No-
tice of any such public hearing must be delivered in writing at least thirty
(30) days in advance to the director of the Idaho department of parks and
recreation. A political subdivision must accept and consider any comment
from the director of the Idaho department of parks and recreation received
within the thirty (30) day period or at the public hearing.
(8) When operating an off-highway vehicle upon on highways, off-high-
way vehicles must not travel at speeds greater than the posted speed limit or
forty-five (45) miles per hour, whichever is less.
(9) The requirements of title 18 and chapters 2, 3, 6, 8, 12, 13, and
14, title 49, Idaho Code, apply to the operation of off-highway vehicles upon
highways.
(10) Off-highway vehicles may be used on highways located on state lands
or federal lands that are not part of the highway system of the state of
Idaho, provided the numbering requirements of section 67-7122 or 67-7124
chapter 71, title 67, Idaho Code, are met.
SECTION 49. That Section 49-428, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-428. DISPLAY OF PLATE AND STICKERS. (1) License plates assigned to
a motor vehicle shall be attached, one (1) in the front and the other in the
rear, with the exception of the following:
(a) The license plate assigned to a motorcycle, all-terrain vehicle,
utility type vehicle, motorbike or semitrailer and the license plate
assigned to a motor vehicle operated by a manufacturer, repossession
agent or dealer shall be attached to the rear.


(b) Vehicles displaying year of manufacture, old timer, classic car,
street rod, or custom vehicle license plates shall be allowed to display
one (1) plate attached to the rear of the vehicle.
(c) The license plate attached to a tractor shall be attached to the
front.
(d) The wrecker plate shall be displayed on the vehicle being towed in
such a manner as to be visible when the vehicle being towed is approached
from the rear.
License plates shall be displayed during the current registration year. The
annual registration sticker for the current registration year shall be dis-
played on each license plate, except for trailers, semitrailers, and commer-
cial vehicles over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds under the provisions
of sections 49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this title,
the license plates together with the registration stickers shall be consid-
ered as license plates for the year designated on the registration sticker.
For purposes of this chapter, a validation sticker issued to the operator of
an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, or motorbike under the provi-
sions of sections 67-7122 and 67-7124, Idaho Code, shall be considered the
registration sticker.
(2) Every license plate shall at all times be securely fastened to the
vehicle to which it is assigned to prevent the plate from swinging, be at a
height not less than twelve (12) inches from the ground, measuring from the
bottom of the plate, be in a place and position to be clearly visible, and be
maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition to be clearly legi-
ble, and all registration stickers shall be securely attached to the license
plates and shall be displayed as provided in section 49-443(4), Idaho Code.
SECTION 50. That Section 49-431, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-431. ASSIGNMENT OR TRANSFER OF INTEREST -- PROCEDURE. (1) Whenever
the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of sections 49-402 and
or 49-402A, Idaho Code, transfers or assigns his title or interest thereto,
the registration card and license plate shall remain with and in the pos-
session of the transferor, and before the license plate shall be displayed
upon on another vehicle owned by the transferor, the transferor shall have
that vehicle registered as provided for in section 49-401A, Idaho Code. The
transfer fees collected shall be paid to the county treasurer where the vehi-
cle is registered and deposited in the county current expense fund or in the
state highway account if the transfer is made by the department.
(a) For all vehicles registered under the provisions of section
49-402(1), Idaho Code, the transferor shall pay the registration fee as
specified in that subsection less the registration fee already paid,
plus a transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00). If the transferor shall
have an older vehicle to be registered, the transferor shall pay a
transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00).
(b) For vehicles registered in accordance with subsections (2) through
(4) of section 49-402(2) and (3), Idaho Code, the operating fee shall
be the fee specified in those subsections, plus a transfer fee of five
dollars ($5.00).


(c) For utility trailers registered under the provisions of section
49-402A, Idaho Code, the original registration shall continue until its
expiration date, upon payment of a transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00).
(2) For all vehicles registered under the fee schedule in section
49-434, Idaho Code, except proportionally registered vehicles under section
49-435, Idaho Code, the transferor shall pay the registration fee as speci-
fied in that section less the registration fee already paid, plus a transfer
fee of five dollars ($5.00).
(3) For all vehicles registered under section 49-435, Idaho Code, the
transferor shall pay the registration fee as specified in section 49-434,
Idaho Code, apportioned according to the provisions of section 49-435, Idaho
Code, less the apportioned fee previously paid plus a transfer fee of eight
dollars ($8.00).
(4) In the event of a transfer by operation of law of the title or in-
terest of an owner in and to a vehicle registered as specified in sections
49-402, 49-402A, 49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code, as upon inheritance, devise
or bequest, order in bankruptcy or insolvency, execution sale, repossession
upon default in performing the terms of a lease or executory sales contract,
or otherwise, the registration shall expire and the registration card and
plates shall be surrendered to the department. The vehicle shall not be
operated upon on the highways until and unless the person entitled thereto
shall apply for and obtain a new registration card and plates in accordance
with the provisions of section 49-401A, Idaho Code. However, an administra-
tor, executor, trustee or other representative of the owner, or a sheriff
or other officer, or legal representative of any such person may operate or
cause to be operated any vehicle upon on the highway from the place of removal
or place where formerly kept by the owner to a place of keeping or storage,
provided the place of removal and place of destination are both located
within the state of Idaho, and after obtaining a written permit from the de-
partment of the local police authorities having jurisdiction of the highways
and upon displaying in plain sight upon on the vehicle a placard bearing the
name and address of the person authorizing and directing such movement, the
placard to be plainly readable from a distance of one hundred (100) feet
during daylight.
SECTION 51. That Section 49-443, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-443. LICENSE PLATES TO BE FURNISHED BY DEPARTMENT -- FORM AND
CONTENTS. (1) The assessor or the department shall furnish to every owner
whose vehicle is registered or licensed by that office, pursuant to sections
49-402 and or 49-402A, Idaho Code, one (1) license plate for vehicles regis-
tered under the provisions of section 49-406, 49-406A or 49-408, Idaho Code,
or a motorcycle, trailer, truck-tractor, or semitrailer; one (1) restricted
vehicle license plate for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and
motorbikes licensed pursuant to this chapter; and two (2) license plates
for every other motor vehicle. If a vehicle is issued one (1) plate only,
that plate shall be displayed in accordance with the provisions of section
49-428, Idaho Code. For vehicles registered under the provisions of section
49-407, Idaho Code, the applicant shall provide one (1) plate to be displayed
on the rear of the vehicle.


Commencing January 1, 1992, the color and design of the plates shall
be comparable to the color and design of the statehood centennial issue of
license plates with blue numerals and letters on a multicolored red, white
and blue background. Each license plate must bear upon on its face the in-
scriptions "Famous Potatoes" and "Scenic Idaho." The restricted vehicle
license plate for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and motor-
bikes shall be a white background with black numerals and letters, with
"Idaho Restricted Vehicle" and the year of its expiration on its face and no
other inscription. The restricted vehicle license plate shall be the same
size required for the motorcycle license plate.
Every license plate shall have displayed upon on it the registration
number assigned to the vehicle and its owner and the name "Idaho," which
may be abbreviated. The plates issued under the provisions of section
49-402(1), Idaho Code, and the required letters and numerals, including an
identification of the county in which the motor vehicle to which the plates
will be affixed is registered, shall be of sufficient size to be plainly
readable from a distance of seventy-five (75) feet during daylight, and each
license plate and registration sticker shall be treated with a fully reflec-
torized material according to specifications prescribed by the board.
(2) License plates shall be valid for a period of ten (10) years begin-
ning with the date of issuance of new plates. At the end of the ninth year,
the registered owner shall receive notice of the date upon which the plates
will expire.
For specialty license plate programs discontinued pursuant to the
provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code, a registrant with a specialty
license plate currently registered under the program may use such license
plate for up to ten (10) years from the date of issuance. This provision
is intended to permit the use of the specialty plate by the registrant re-
gardless of the number of persons who purchase the specialty plate. The
registrant shall be required to pay the special plate program fees provided
for specialty plates pursuant to this chapter. Such fees shall be deposited
into the state highway account. For purposes of section 49-434, Idaho Code,
as it applies to commercial vehicles, and section 49-435, Idaho Code, the
department shall provide new plates bearing the same number or, upon request
from the registered owner, the next available number.
(3) If a license plate number has expired as provided in subsection (2)
of this section and is not renewed within sixty (60) days of its expiration,
the plate number shall be available for use by another registrant. To obtain
a specific number in the recycled license plate number file, the owner of a
registered vehicle may contact the county regarding availability.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to vehicles regis-
tered under the provisions of section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, and section
49-434(1), Idaho Code, as it applies to noncommercial vehicles.
(4) License plates issued for vehicles required to be registered in
accordance with the provisions of sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code,
shall be issued color-coded red, white or blue registration validation
stickers showing the year of registration. Each registration validation
sticker shall bear a number from 1 through 12, which number shall correspond
to the month of the calendar year in which the registration of the vehicle


expires and shall be affixed to the lower right-hand corner of the plates
within the outlined rectangular area.
(5) License plates for utility trailers registered under the provi-
sions of section 49-402A, Idaho Code, that are issued for five (5) or ten (10)
years and license plates for rental utility trailers registered under the
provisions of section 49-434, Idaho Code, that are issued for up to five (5)
years shall use the design in effect on the date of manufacture. If a design
change occurs, plates from the effective date of the design change shall be
manufactured using the new design. Unexpired plates need not be reissued to
conform to a design change.
(6) For license plates that are lost, stolen, mutilated, or illegible,
the owner shall apply for a duplicate or substitute. The assessor shall also
furnish for each registration, and to validate the license plate, a pres-
sure-sensitive, uniquely numbered, color-coded red, white or blue regis-
tration sticker, except for trailers and semitrailers registered under the
provisions in section 49-434, Idaho Code. License plates issued for state,
county and city motor vehicles shall be valid for ten (10) years pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section and remain on the vehicle for which issued
from year to year and need no renewal or validation sticker.
(7) Whenever a vehicle is completely destroyed by fire or accident and
the operator submits satisfactory proof of that destruction to the depart-
ment or appropriate assessor's office, or the owner wishes to transfer the
remaining registration, use increment and fees shall be transferred to the
replacement vehicle for a service transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00),
which fee shall be retained by the registering authority. None of the orig-
inal fees shall be subject to refund.
(8) The department shall furnish a printed or an electronic copy of the
registration card to every owner whose vehicle is registered under sections
49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code.
(9) The board shall have authority to require the return to the depart-
ment of all license plates and registration stickers upon termination of the
lawful use of them by the owner.
(10) The board may promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 52. That Section 49-456, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-456. VIOLATIONS OF REGISTRATION PROVISIONS. It shall be unlawful
for any person:
(1) To operate or for the owner to permit the operation upon on a highway
of any motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer that is not registered and that
does not have attached and displayed the license plates assigned to it for
the current registration year, subject to the exemptions allowed in sections
49-426, 49-431 and 49-432, Idaho Code.;
(2) To operate or for the owner to permit the operation on state and fed-
eral lands or upon highways, or sections of highways, as permitted under sec-
tion 49-426(3) and (4), Idaho Code, any all-terrain vehicle, utility type
vehicle or motorbike that does not have a valid and properly displayed re-
stricted license plate issued pursuant to this chapter and attached valida-


tion sticker issued pursuant to section 67-7122 or 67-7124, Idaho Code, sub-
ject to the exemptions allowed in section 49-426(2), Idaho Code.
(3) (2) To display or cause or permit to be displayed, or to have in pos-
session, any registration card or license plate knowing the same to be ficti-
tious or to have been canceled, revoked, suspended or altered.;
(4) (3) To lend or knowingly permit the use by one not entitled to any
registration card or license plate issued to the person so lending or permit-
ting that use.;
(5) (4) To fail or refuse to surrender to the department, upon demand,
any registration card or license plate that has been suspended, canceled or
revoked.; or
(6) (5) To use a false or fictitious name or address in any applica-
tion for the registration of any vehicle, or for any renewal or duplicate, or
knowingly to make a false statement or conceal a material fact or otherwise
commit a fraud in any application.
SECTION 53. That Section 49-504, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-504. APPLICATIONS TO DEPARTMENT FOR CERTIFICATES -- PROCEDURE --
IDENTIFICATION NUMBERS. (1) Application for a certificate of title shall be
made upon on a form furnished by the department and shall contain the owner's
Idaho driver's license number, Idaho identification card number or social
security number or individual taxpayer identification number. In the case
of a business, the employer tax identification number is required. Every
application shall also contain the owner's true and full legal name. In
the event that the owner does not possess a social security number, Idaho
driver's license number, Idaho identification card number or individual
taxpayer identification number, the owner shall present written documenta-
tion sufficient to the department to determine that no social security num-
ber has been issued. In the event that a business, trust, or other statuto-
rily created entity is not required to have and does not possess an employer
tax identification number, the applicant shall provide a written statement
certifying that the entity does not possess an employer tax identification
number. The form must contain the owner's physical domicile address or,
in the case of a business, trust or other statutorily created entity, such
entity's physical address and any mailing address if different from the
physical address. If the owner has submitted an application pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the owner may state, in
the application required pursuant to this section, the applicant's alterna-
tive Idaho mailing address in place of his or her physical domicile address.
Such application must be signed by the owner and contain a full description
of the vehicle, including the make, identification numbers, and the odometer
reading at the time of sale or transfer, and whether the vehicle is new or
used, together with a statement of the applicant's title and of any liens or
encumbrances upon on the vehicle, and the name and address of the person to
whom the certificate of title shall be delivered, and any other information
as the department may require. The application shall be filed with the de-
partment and, if a certificate of title has previously been issued for that
vehicle in this state, shall be accompanied by the certificate of title duly
assigned, unless otherwise provided for in this chapter. The department


may promulgate rules to provide for exceptions to the odometer requirement.
Social security numbers collected shall not appear on certificates of title,
and all applications on file shall be exempt from disclosure, except as pro-
vided in sections 49-202, 49-203 and 49-203A, Idaho Code.
(2) If the current certificate of title was not issued for the vehicle
in this state, the application, unless otherwise provided for in this chap-
ter, shall be accompanied by a certificate of title, bill of sale or other ev-
idence of ownership required by the law of any other jurisdiction from which
the vehicle was brought into this state and a vehicle identification number
inspection completed by any city, county or state peace officer or other spe-
cial agent authorized by the department.
(3) In the case of a new vehicle being titled for the first time, no cer-
tificate of title or registration shall be issued unless the application is
endorsed by a franchised new vehicle dealer licensed to sell a new vehicle.
Each application shall be accompanied by a statement completed by the fran-
chised new car dealer that it is authorized to transfer the vehicle to the
purchaser. The dealer shall retain in its records a manufacturer's certifi-
cate of origin or manufacturer's statement of origin executed by the manu-
facturer and delivered to his agent or his franchised vehicle dealer. The
certificate or statement of origin shall be in a form prescribed by the board
and shall contain the year of manufacture or the model year of the vehicle,
the manufacturer's vehicle identification number, the name of the manufac-
turer, the number of cylinders, a general description of the body, if any,
and the type or model. Upon sale of a new vehicle, the manufacturer or his
agent or franchised dealer shall execute and deliver to the purchaser an as-
signment of the certificate or statement, together with any lien or encum-
brance to which the vehicle is subject. The certificate or statement will be
retained by the dealer for five (5) years so that it is available for inspec-
tion by the department.
(4) The department shall retain the evidence of title presented by
the applicant and on which the certificate of title is issued. The depart-
ment shall maintain an identification numbers index of registered vehicles
except that said index is not required to include operators who have been
issued a certificate of number or nonresident user certificate pursuant to
sections 67-7122 and 67-7124, Idaho Code, and, upon receiving an applica-
tion for a certificate of title, shall first check the identification number
shown in the application against the index. The department, when satisfied
that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle and that the application is in
proper form, shall issue in the name of the owner of the vehicle a certifi-
cate of title bearing a title number, the date issued and a description of
the vehicle as determined by the department, together with a statement of
the owner's title and of all liens or encumbrances upon on the vehicle, and
whether possession is held by the owner under a lease, contract or condi-
tional sale, or other like agreement.
(5) In all cases of transfer of vehicles, the application for certifi-
cates of title shall be filed within thirty (30) calendar days after the de-
livery of the vehicles. Licensed dealers need not apply for certificate of
title for vehicles in stock or when they are acquired for stock purposes.
(6) In the case of the sale of a vehicle by a dealer to a general pur-
chaser or user, the certificate of title shall be obtained in the name of the


purchaser by the dealer upon application signed by the purchaser. If a lien
is to be recorded, the title documentation as required in this section shall
be submitted to the department by the dealer or the lienholder upon appli-
cation signed by the purchaser. A copy of this application shall be given
to the purchaser to be used as a seventy-two (72) hour temporary permit,
unless the application is submitted by an electronic means approved by the
department, in which case a forty-five (45) calendar day temporary permit
may be issued. In all other cases, the certificates shall be obtained by the
purchaser and the certificate of title properly assigned and dated by the
seller, or the seller's bill of sale shall serve as a seventy-two (72) hour
permit. The seventy-two (72) hour time period for temporary permits shall
be calculated excluding weekend days and legal holidays observed by the
state of Idaho. These temporary permits allow operation of any noncommer-
cial vehicle or unladened commercial vehicle or vehicle combination without
license plates for the period of time specified in the permit. A ladened
commercial vehicle or vehicle combination may also operate without license
plates for the period of time specified in the temporary permit, provided
that the owner or operator has also obtained a permit issued under the provi-
sions of section 49-432, Idaho Code.
(7) If the vehicle has no identification number, then the department
shall designate an identification number for that vehicle at the time of is-
suance of the certificate of title. The identification number shall be per-
manently affixed to or indented upon on the frame of the vehicle and legibly
maintained by the owner at all times while a certificate of title to the vehi-
cle shall be issued and outstanding.
(8) An EVC provider authorized pursuant to section 49-401C, Idaho Code,
may act on behalf of the department in receiving, processing, and transmit-
ting applications for title and any related fees to the department. The se-
curity, oversight, and processing requirements in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho
Code, shall also apply to titling transactions conducted by an EVC provider.
(9) The department may allow a person to submit a required document by
using electronic media deemed feasible by the department instead of requir-
ing an original document. If a signature on a document is required by law and
the document is submitted electronically, the signature requirement will
be satisfied by an authenticated electronically submitted signature. An
electronically submitted document, once accepted by the department, shall
be deemed the same as an original document and shall be admissible in all
administrative, quasi-judicial, and judicial proceedings.
SECTION 54. That Section 67-2913A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
67-2913A. SNOWMOBILE SEARCH AND RESCUE FUND -- ADVISORY COMMIT-
TEE. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the snowmobile search
and rescue fund. Moneys in the snowmobile search and rescue fund shall be
perpetually appropriated to and shall be used by the director of the Idaho
state police for the purpose of defraying costs of search and rescue oper-
ations which that are conducted by a county sheriff's office to assist or
recover individuals riding snowmobiles, and for no other purpose. One hun-
dred percent (100%) of the moneys distributed to the fund pursuant to section
67-7106 67-7112, Idaho Code, shall be deposited to the credit of the state


snowmobile search and rescue fund. The fund shall be administered in the
same manner as the state search and rescue fund created in section 67-2913,
Idaho Code. The director of the Idaho state police is authorized to allocate
up to ten percent (10%) of the moneys for reimbursement of administrative
expenses.
(2) In the event the balance in the state snowmobile search and rescue
fund exceeds thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) on July 1 of any year, moneys
in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) shall be divided into two (2)
equal parts and distributed to the:
(a) Training subaccount of the search and rescue fund created in sec-
tion 67-2913, Idaho Code; and
(b) State snowmobile fund created in section 67-7106 67-7112, Idaho
Code, to be used exclusively by the director of the Idaho department of
parks and recreation for snowmobile trail groomer replacement.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest all moneys in the state snowmobile
search and rescue fund and the interest and proceeds earned on such invest-
ments shall be returned to the state snowmobile search and rescue fund.
(4) In the event that all moneys in the state snowmobile search and res-
cue fund are exhausted or no longer available, nothing in this chapter shall
be construed to absolve any entity which that would otherwise provide appli-
cable services, from conducting search and rescue operations to assist or
recover individuals riding snowmobiles. Nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to limit recovery of moneys solely to the state snowmobile search
and rescue fund for search and rescue operations assisting or recovering in-
dividuals riding snowmobiles.
(5) A three (3) member advisory committee shall review the operation
and disbursement of moneys from the fund at the end of each fiscal year, and
shall report to the fund administrator any proposed guidelines or policies
deemed appropriate to improve operation of the fund. The committee shall
be comprised of one (1) representative from the Idaho state snowmobile as-
sociation, one (1) representative from the Idaho sheriffs' association, and
one (1) representative appointed by the director of the Idaho department of
parks and recreation. The respective organizations shall be responsible for
reimbursing their member representative for any expenses incurred for ser-
vice on the committee.
SECTION 55. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.